test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-saada_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - saađa - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     saađa+V+Inf: saađa
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saan
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: saat
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saapi
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: saama
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: saatta
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: saađhaan
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sain
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sait
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sai
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: saima
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: saitta
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: saathiin
     saađa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: saanu
     saađa+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: saatu
     saađa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: saanheet
     saađa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: saava
     saađa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: saavat
     saađa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: saatava
     saađa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: saatavat
   
     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: saisin
     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: saisit
     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: sais
     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: saisima
     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: saisitta
     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: saatais
     saađa+V+Pass+Cond: saatais
     
     saađa+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: saa
     saađa+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: saakkaa
     
     saađa+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: saamassa
     saađa+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: saamasta
     saađa+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: saamhaan
     saađa+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: saamala
     saađa+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: saamatta
   
